Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 18 Natural Gas Motor Vehicles

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 97, § 3 makes this act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 27, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 97, § 1, enacted this chapter as Chapter 17. It has been redesignated as Chapter 18 at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

§ 9-18-101.
Purchase of state vehicles which operate on natural gas. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 97, §
1, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2013 ch. 97, §
1, effective June 30, 2017.

§ 9-18-102.
Sunset.

W.S.

9-18-101

is repealed effective June 30, 2017.

History.

2013 ch. 97, § 1, effective February 27, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 97, § 1, enacted this section as §

9-17-102

. It has been redesignated as §

9-18-102

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.